Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.235

Renewal of licenses—Delinquency.

(1) If an application for renewal of a pesticide dealer license is not filed on or before the business license expiration date, the business license delinquency fee must be assessed under chapter 19.02 RCW and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued.

(2) If application for renewal of any license provided for in this chapter other than the pesticide dealer license is not filed on or before the expiration date of the license, a penalty equivalent to the license fee must be assessed and added to the original fee, and must be paid by the applicant before the renewal license is issued. However, such penalty does not apply if the applicant furnishes an affidavit certifying that he or she has not acted as a licensee subsequent to the expiration of the license.

(3) Any license for which a renewal application has been made, all other requirements have been met, and the proper fee paid, continues in full force and effect until the director notifies the applicant that the license has been renewed or the application has been denied.

[ 2013 c 144 s 11; 1989 c 380 s 19.]